West Virginia, session 2025, SB376.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 10, 2024, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (operation of barber, cosmetology, nail technology, aesthetic, hair styling, and waxing salons and schools, 3 CSR 05), is authorized.